test/src/morphology/N-spleish_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - spleiš: # Noun 107 'eng /est pleiss/fin' - full paradigm
     spleiš+N+Sg+Nom: spleiš
     spleiš+N+Sg+Gen: spleiš
     spleiš+N+Sg+Par: spleišõ
     spleiš+N+Sg+Dat: spleišõn
     spleiš+N+Sg+Ins: spleišõks
     spleiš+N+Sg+Ill: spleišõ
     spleiš+N+Sg+Ela: spleišõst
     spleiš+N+Pl+Nom: splēšõd
     spleiš+N+Pl+Gen: splēšõd
     spleiš+N+Pl+Par: splēšidi
     spleiš+N+Pl+Dat: splēšõdõn
     spleiš+N+Pl+Ins: splēšõdõks
     spleiš+N+Pl+Ill: splēšiz
     spleiš+N+Pl+Ela: splēšist
